Massachusetts, session 194th, S907.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority 
of the same, as follows: 
 
Notwithstanding any general or special law or any provision of chapter 111 of the general 
laws or any regulation promulgated thereunder to the contrary, the department, as defined under 
section 1 of said chapter 111, is hereby authorized and directed reissue department license 
number 2114, issued by said department November 6, 2022, in order to maintain the provision of 
health care services, including, but not limited to, the provision of chemotherapy, radiation, 
radiology, and other forms of life-saving health care and therapies and studies, that are provided, 
as of the date of this act, 22LD, known as Norwood Performance Therapy, and any other such 

of 2 8 facilities operating under said license number 2114 that is not currently under the any other 
license issued by the department of public health.